Hawaii statutes.
[§174C-16] Severability. If any
provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, this invalidity does not affect other provisions
or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are
severable. [L 1987, c 45, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next